trunk/apertium-sv-da/dev/saldo.found.dix
<pardef n="styck__n_v">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>na</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ens</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nas</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ens</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ets</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>na</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ens</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nas</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ena</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>enas</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="år__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ets</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ens</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="kam/mare__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l>mare</l>      <r>mare<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mares</l>     <r>mare<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>maren</l>     <r>mare<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>marens</l>    <r>mare<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rar</l>       <r>mare<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mare</l>      <r>mare<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rars</l>      <r>mare<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mares</l>     <r>mare<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rarna</l>     <r>mare<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rarnas</l>    <r>mare<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="grevar__n_p">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="p"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="p"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>na</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="p"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nas</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="p"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="bit__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ens</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ar</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ars</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>arna</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>arnas</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ens</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="te__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="euro__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ns</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>na</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nas</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="cell/o__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l>o</l>         <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>os</l>        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>on</l>        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ons</l>       <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>or</l>        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ors</l>       <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>is</l>        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>orna</l>      <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ornas</l>     <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="kammare">         <i>kam</i><par n="kam/mare__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="te">              <i>te</i><par n="te__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="spån">            <i>spån</i><par n="år__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="styck">           <i>styck</i><par n="styck__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="sviter">          <i>sviter</i><par n="grevar__n_p"/></e>
<e lm="teleskop">        <i>teleskop</i><par n="år__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="praktiker">       <i>praktiker</i><par n="euro__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="skidspår">        <i>skidspår</i><par n="år__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="städ">            <i>städ</i><par n="år__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="studier">         <i>studier</i><par n="grevar__n_p"/></e>
<e lm="sammandrag">      <i>sammandrag</i><par n="år__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="vin">             <i>vin</i><par n="te__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="segelfartyg">     <i>segelfartyg</i><par n="år__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="starter">         <i>starter</i><par n="euro__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="överdrag">        <i>överdrag</i><par n="år__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="tak">             <i>tak</i><par n="år__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="lamm">            <i>lamm</i><par n="te__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="mat">             <i>mat</i><par n="te__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="dryck">           <i>dryck</i><par n="te__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="storföretag">     <i>storföretag</i><par n="år__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="tillgångar">      <i>tillgångar</i><par n="grevar__n_p"/></e>
<e lm="torn">            <i>torn</i><par n="år__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="termer">          <i>termer</i><par n="grevar__n_p"/></e>
<e lm="grevar">          <i>grevar</i><par n="grevar__n_p"/></e>
<e lm="undantagstillstånd"><i>undantagstillstånd</i><par n="år__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="musiker">         <i>musiker</i><par n="euro__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="vattendrag">      <i>vattendrag</i><par n="år__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="spädbarn">        <i>spädbarn</i><par n="år__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="byte">            <i>byte</i><par n="euro__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="uppslag">         <i>uppslag</i><par n="år__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="emblem">          <i>emblem</i><par n="år__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="operativsystem">  <i>operativsystem</i><par n="år__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="fonem">           <i>fonem</i><par n="år__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="skriftspråk">     <i>skriftspråk</i><par n="år__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="uppbrott">        <i>uppbrott</i><par n="år__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="grammatiker">     <i>grammatiker</i><par n="euro__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="skrin">           <i>skrin</i><par n="år__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="botaniker">       <i>botaniker</i><par n="euro__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="kvart">           <i>kvart</i><par n="bit__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="tekniker">        <i>tekniker</i><par n="euro__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="uppehåll">        <i>uppehåll</i><par n="år__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="ändamål">         <i>ändamål</i><par n="år__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="kaffe">           <i>kaffe</i><par n="te__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="skelett">         <i>skelett</i><par n="år__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="cembalo">         <i>cembal</i><par n="cell/o__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="mejl">            <i>mejl</i><par n="år__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="eksem">           <i>eksem</i><par n="år__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="uttryck">         <i>uttryck</i><par n="år__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="kritiker">        <i>kritiker</i><par n="euro__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="slaganfall">      <i>slaganfall</i><par n="år__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="euro">            <i>euro</i><par n="euro__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="uppslagsverk">    <i>uppslagsverk</i><par n="år__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="sommarlov">       <i>sommarlov</i><par n="år__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="bit">             <i>bit</i><par n="bit__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="vattenfall">      <i>vattenfall</i><par n="år__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="hammare">         <i>ham</i><par n="kam/mare__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="småbarn">         <i>småbarn</i><par n="år__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="stopp">           <i>stopp</i><par n="år__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="klöver">          <i>klöver</i><par n="euro__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="substantiv">      <i>substantiv</i><par n="år__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="sken">            <i>sken</i><par n="år__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="statistiker">     <i>statistiker</i><par n="euro__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="utspel">          <i>utspel</i><par n="år__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="cello">           <i>cell</i><par n="cell/o__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="återfall">        <i>återfall</i><par n="år__n_nt"/></e>
